Missouri, session 2026, SB1802.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 50.1000 and 70.600, RSMo, are repealed
and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 50.1000 and 70.600, to read as follows:
50.1000. As used in sections 50.1000 to 50.1300, the
following words and terms mean:
(1) "Annuity", annual payments, made in equal monthly
installments, to a retired member from funds provided for
in, or authorized by, the provisions of sections 50.1000 to
50.1300;
(2) "Average final compensation", the monthly average
of the two highest years of annual compensation received by
the member;
(3) "Board of directors" or "board", the board of
directors established by the provisions of sections 50.1000
to 50.1300;
(4) "Compensation", all salary and other compensation
payable to a county employee for personal services rendered
as a county employee, but not including travel and mileage
reimbursement, and not including compensation in excess of
the limit imposed by 26 U.S.C. Section 401(a)(17);
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1802 2
(5) "County", each county in the state, except any
city not within a county and counties of the first
classification with a charter form of government;
(6) "Creditable service", a member's period of
employment as an employee, including the member's prior
service, except as provided in sections 50.1090 and 50.1140;
(7) "Effective date of the establishment of the
system", August 28, 1994, the date the retirement system was
established;
(8) "Employee", any county elective or appointive
officer or employee who is hired and fired by the county or
by the circuit court located in a county of the first
classification without a charter form of government which is
not participating in LAGERS, whose work and responsibilities
are directed and controlled by the county or by the circuit
court located in a county of the first classification
without a charter form of government which is not
participating in LAGERS, who is compensated directly from
county funds, and whose position requires the actual
performance of duties during not less than one thousand
hours per year, except county prosecuting attorneys covered
pursuant to sections 56.800 to 56.840, circuit clerks and
deputy circuit clerks covered under the Missouri state
retirement system and county sheriffs covered pursuant to
sections 57.949 to 57.997 in each county of the state,
except for any city not within a county and any county of
the first classification having a charter form of government;
(9) "LAGERS", the local government employees'
retirement system presently codified at sections 70.600 to
70.755;
(10) "Primary Social Security amount", the old age
insurance benefit pursuant to Section 202 of the Social

SB 1802 3
Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 402) payable to a member at
age sixty-two. The primary Social Security amount shall be
determined pursuant to the Social Security Act as in effect
at the time the employee's normal annuity pursuant to
section 50.1060 is determined. Such determination shall be
at the time that creditable service ends without assuming
any future increases in compensation, any future increases
in the taxable wage base, any changes in the formulas used
pursuant to the Social Security Act, or any future increases
in the consumer price index. However, it shall be assumed
that the employee will continue to receive compensation at
the same rate as that received at the time the determination
is being made, until the member reaches age sixty-two. Only
compensation with respect to creditable service as a county
employee shall be considered, and the first year of
compensation as a county employee shall be regressed at
three percent per year with respect to years prior to the
period of creditable service;
(11) "Prior service", service of a member rendered
prior to August 28, 1994, the effective date of the
establishment of the system;
(12) "Required beginning date", the April first of the
calendar year following the later of the calendar year in
which the member reaches age seventy and one-half, or the
calendar year in which the member retires;
(13) "Retirement fund" or "fund", the funds held by
the county employees' retirement system;
(14) "Retirement system" or "system", the county
employees' retirement system authorized by the provisions of
sections 50.1000 to 50.1300;
(15) "Target replacement ratio":

SB 1802 4
(a) Eighty percent, if a member's average final
compensation is thirty thousand dollars or less;
(b) Seventy-seven percent, if a member's average final
compensation is forty thousand dollars or less, but greater
than thirty thousand dollars;
(c) Seventy-two percent, if a member's average final
compensation is fifty thousand dollars or less, but greater
than forty thousand dollars;
(d) Seventy percent, if a member's average final
compensation is greater than fifty thousand dollars.
70.600. The following words and phrases as used in
sections 70.600 to 70.755, unless a different meaning is
plainly required by the context, shall mean:
(1) "Accumulated contributions", the total of all
amounts deducted from the compensations of a member and
standing to the member's credit in his or her individual
account in the members deposit fund, together with
investment credits thereon;
(2) "Actuarial equivalent", a benefit of equal reserve
value;
(3) "Allowance", the total of the annuity and the
pension. All allowances shall be paid not later than the
tenth day of each calendar month;
(4) "Annuity", a monthly amount derived from the
accumulated contributions of a member and payable by the
system throughout the life of a person or for a temporary
period;
(5) "Beneficiary", any person who is receiving or
designated to receive a system benefit, except a retirant;
(6) "Benefit program", a schedule of benefits or
benefit formulas from which the amounts of system benefits
can be determined;

SB 1802 5
(7) "Board of trustees" or "board", the board of
trustees of the system;
(8) "Compensation", the remuneration paid an employee
by a political subdivision or by an elected fee official of
the political subdivision for personal services rendered by
the employee for the political subdivision or for the
elected fee official in the employee's public capacity;
provided, that for an elected fee official, the term
"compensation" means that portion of his or her fees which
is net after deduction of (a) compensation paid by such
elected fee official to his or her office employees, if any,
and (b) the ordinary and necessary expenses paid by such
elected fee official and attributable to the operation of
his or her office. In cases where an employee's
compensation is not all paid in money, the political
subdivision shall fix the reasonable value of the employee's
compensation not paid in money. In determining compensation
no consideration shall be given to:
(a) Any nonrecurring single sum payment paid by an
employer;
(b) Employer contributions to any employee benefit
plan or trust;
(c) Any other unusual or nonrecurring remuneration; or
(d) Compensation in excess of the limitations set
forth in [Internal Revenue Code] Section 401(a)(17) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C. Section
401(a)(17). The limitation on compensation for eligible
employees shall not be less than the amount which was
allowed to be taken into account under the system as in
effect on July 1, 1993. For purposes of this paragraph,
[an] the term "eligible employee" [is] means an individual

SB 1802 6
who was a member of the system before the first plan year
beginning after December 31, 1995;
(9) "Credited service", the total of a member's prior
service and membership service, to the extent such service
is standing to the member's credit as provided in sections
70.600 to 70.755;
(10) "Employee", any person regularly employed by a
political subdivision who receives compensation from the
political subdivision for personal services rendered the
political subdivision, including any elected official of the
political subdivision whose position requires his or her
regular personal services and who is compensated wholly or
in part on a fee basis, and including the employees of such
elected fee officials who may be compensated by such elected
fee officials. The term "employee" may include any elected
county official. The term "employee" shall not include any
person:
(a) Who is not an elected official of the political
subdivision and who is included as an active member in any
other plan similar in purpose to this system by reason of
his or her employment with his or her political subdivision,
except the federal Social Security Old Age, Survivors, and
Disability Insurance Program, as amended; or
(b) Who acts for the political subdivision under
contract; or
(c) Who is paid wholly on a fee basis, except elected
officials and their employees; or
(d) Who holds the position of mayor, presiding judge,
president or chairman of the political subdivision or is a
member of the governing body of the political subdivision;
except that, such an official of a political subdivision
having ten or more other employees may become a member if

SB 1802 7
the official is covered under the federal Social Security
Old Age, Survivors, and Disability Insurance Program, as
amended, by reason of such official's employment with his or
her political subdivision, by filing written application for
membership with the board after the date the official
qualifies for such position or within thirty days after the
date his or her political subdivision becomes an employer,
whichever date is later;
(11) "Employer", any political subdivision which has
elected to have all its eligible employees covered by the
system;
(12) "Final average salary", the monthly average of
the compensations paid an employee during the period of
sixty or, if an election has been made in accordance with
100 section 70.656, thirty-six consecutive months of credited
101 service producing the highest monthly average, which period
102 is contained within the period of one hundred twenty
103 consecutive months of credited service immediately preceding
104 his or her termination of membership. Should a member have
105 less than sixty or, if an election has been made in
106 accordance with section 70.656, thirty-six months of
107 credited service, "final average salary" means the monthly
108 average of compensation paid the member during his or her
109 total months of credited service;
110 (13) "Fireman", any regular or permanent employee of
111 the fire department of a political subdivision, including a
112 probationary fireman. The term "fireman" shall not include:
113 (a) Any volunteer fireman; or
114 (b) Any civilian employee of a fire department; or
115 (c) Any person temporarily employed as a fireman for
116 an emergency;

SB 1802 8
117 (14) "Member", any employee included in the membership
118 of the system;
119 (15) "Membership service", employment as an employee
120 with the political subdivision from and after the date such
121 political subdivision becomes an employer, which employment
122 is creditable as service hereunder;
123 (16) "Minimum service retirement age", age sixty for a
124 member who is neither public safety personnel as [defined]
125 described in section 70.631, a policeman, nor a fireman;
126 "minimum service retirement age", age fifty-five for a
127 member who is public safety personnel as [defined] described
128 in section 70.631, a policeman, or a fireman;
129 (17) "Pension", a monthly amount derived from
130 contributions of an employer and payable by the system
131 throughout the life of a person or for a temporary period;
132 (18) "Policeman", any regular or permanent employee of
133 the police department of a political subdivision, including
134 a probationary policeman. The term "policeman" shall not
135 include:
136 (a) Any civilian employee of a police department; or
137 (b) Any person temporarily employed as a policeman for
138 an emergency;
139 (19) "Political subdivision", any governmental
140 subdivision of this state created pursuant to the laws of
141 this state, and having the power to tax, except public
142 school districts; a board of utilities or a board of public
143 works which is required by charter or ordinance to establish
144 the compensation of employees of the utility separate from
145 the compensation of other employees of the city may be
146 considered a political subdivision for purposes of sections
147 70.600 to 70.755; a joint municipal utility commission may

SB 1802 9
148 be considered a political subdivision for purposes of
149 sections 70.600 to 70.755;
150 (20) "Prior service", employment as an employee with
151 the political subdivision prior to the date such political
152 subdivision becomes an employer, which employment is
153 creditable as service hereunder;
154 (21) "Regular interest" or "investment credits", such
155 reasonable rate or rates per annum, compounded annually, as
156 the board shall adopt annually;
157 (22) "Reserve", the present value of all payments to
158 be made on account of any system benefit based upon such
159 tables of experience and regular interest as the board shall
160 adopt from time to time;
161 (23) "Retirant", a former member receiving a system
162 allowance by reason of having been a member;
163 (24) "Retirement system" or "system", the Missouri
164 local government employees' retirement system.
✓